Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 2. Districts; District Courts and Judges.
§ 16.1-69.15.
Qualifications of judges.

On and after July 1, 1973, every full-time judge and substitute judge of a district court shall be at the time of his appointment or election a person licensed to practice law in this Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Law Review.

For note, “Limiting Judicial Incompetence: The Due Process Right to a Legally Learned Judge in State Minor Court Criminal Proceedings,” see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1454 (1975).

§ 16.1-69.16.
Residence requirements.

Every judge or substitute judge of a district court shall, during his term of office, reside within the boundaries of the district in which he serves as set out in §

16.1-69.6

; provided, that judges and substitute judges in office on January 1, 1977, or who are otherwise eligible may continue in office and shall be eligible for reappointment or reelection to successive terms in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-69.10

.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the residency requirement set out herein shall not apply to any judge whose residence prior to July 1, 1977, is outside the boundaries of a new district created by §

16.1-69.6

, if such judge is a resident in the geographical area which encompassed the prior district. This provision shall also apply to any subsequent term for which he is elected.

When the boundary of a judicial district is changed to create a new judicial district, any duly elected or appointed judge of the existing judicial district may continue to serve as judge of the new judicial district if he resides therein.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1977, c. 25; 1991, c. 403.

§ 16.1-69.17.
Oath of office of judges, clerks and others.

Every judge, substitute judge, clerk, deputy clerk, and juvenile and domestic relations probation officer of a juvenile and domestic relations district court shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, take the oath required by law. The oath of the judge and substitute judge shall be taken before a clerk of a court of record to which appeals from his court lie or any judge, and the oath of the clerk and other officers of the court shall be taken before the judge of the court he serves.
Any oath taken before a judge or clerk prior to July 1, 1992, and otherwise conforming with this section is valid.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1992, c. 390; 1992, Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, Sp. Sess., c. 1, cl. 2 provides: “That any oath taken before a judge or clerk prior to the effective date of this act [May 11, 1992] and otherwise conforming with this act is valid, and any official acts of the person taking such an oath are also valid.”

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-69.17:1.
Time within which a judge may qualify; failure to do so vacates office.

Any district court judge of this Commonwealth may qualify at any time after receiving his commission and before the expiration of thirty days after the commencement of his term of office; but if he fails to receive his commission until after the commencement of his term of office, he may qualify within thirty days from the date of receiving such commission. If a judge fails to qualify as above provided, his office shall be deemed to be vacant.

History.

1976, c. 374.

§ 16.1-69.18.
Bonds of judges, clerks, and others handling funds.

Before entering upon the performance of his duties every judge, substitute judge, clerk, deputy clerk or other officer or employee of a district court shall enter into bond before the clerk of a circuit court to which appeals from his court lie, except as hereinafter provided. The bond shall be in a penalty and with corporate surety approved by the judge of such appellate court. No such bond shall be in a penalty of less than $3,000, nor more than $75,000, and all such bonds shall be conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the principal. The bonds shall be made payable to the Commonwealth and shall be filed with the clerk of such appellate court. Provided, however, that instead of specific bonds being given as stipulated herein, the Committee on District Courts may in their discretion procure faithful performance of duty blanket bonds for any or all of the districts enumerated in §

16.1-69.6

covering the judges, substitute judges, clerks and other personnel of the several district courts included in such districts and within the penalty limits contained in this section, unless in the discretion of the Committee, bonds with a larger maximum penalty should be obtained. Provided further, that in those instances where specific bonds for judges, clerks, deputy clerks or other officers or employees of a district court are in effect, the Committee on District Courts may, whenever they deem it advisable, terminate such specific bonds upon obtaining a blanket bond covering such court personnel with appropriate refund or credit being made for the unearned premiums on the specific bonds being terminated. A copy of any such blanket bond so procured shall be filed with the Division of Risk Management within the Department of Treasury and with the clerk of the respective circuit courts to which appeals from the decisions of the several district courts may lie. The premiums for such bonds shall be paid by the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, c. 3; 1975, c. 334; 2002, c. 406.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 406 substituted “Division of Risk Management within the Department of Treasury” for “State Comptroller” in the next-to-last sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 2.

§ 16.1-69.19.
Incompatible offices.

No person shall at the same time hold the office of judge or substitute judge of a district court and the office of magistrate, clerk of a court, sheriff, treasurer, or commissioner of the revenue, or deputy of either of them. A full-time district court judge may not serve as a commissioner of accounts, commissioner in chancery or a marriage celebrant appointed by the circuit court pursuant to §

20-25

, nor shall such judge, during his continuance in office, seek or accept any nonjudicial elective office, or hold any other office of public trust or engage in any other incompatible activity. If any judge of a district court shall accept any office for which he is ineligible under this section, such acceptance shall vacate his office as judge of such court.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1976, c. 374; 1993, c. 312.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 2.

§ 16.1-69.20.
Repealed by Acts 1973, c. 546.

§ 16.1-69.21.
When substitute to serve; his powers and duties.

In the event of the inability of the judge to perform the duties of his office or any of them by reason of sickness, absence, vacation, interest in the proceeding or parties before the court, or otherwise, such judge or a person acting on his behalf shall promptly notify the appropriate chief district judge of such inability. If the chief district judge determines that the provisions of §

16.1-69.35

have been complied with or cannot reasonably be done within the time permitted and that no other full-time or retired judge is reasonably available to serve, the chief district judge may direct a substitute judge to serve as a judge of the court, which substitute may serve concurrently with one or more of the judges of the court or alone. When reasonably necessary, the chief district judge may designate a substitute judge from another district within the Commonwealth. The committee on district courts may adopt policies and procedures governing the utilization of substitute judges. In such event, those policies and procedures will, where applicable, control. While acting as judge, a substitute judge shall perform the same duties, exercise the same power and authority, and be subject to the same obligations as prescribed herein for the judge. A substitute judge shall retain the power to enter a final order in any case heard by such substitute judge for a period of 14 days after the date of a hearing of such case. While serving as judge of the court, the judge or the substitute judge may perform all acts with respect to the proceedings, judgments and acts of any other judge in connection with any action or proceeding then pending or theretofore disposed of in the court except as otherwise provided in this chapter in the same manner and with the same force and effect as if they were his own.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1983, c. 128; 1984, c. 570; 2017, c. 650; 2020, c. 118.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 650 deleted the former third sentence, which read: “In designating a substitute judge to serve, the chief district judge shall, whenever possible, select a substitute judge who does not regularly practice law in the court requiring the substitute”; and substituted “When reasonably necessary” for “Where reasonably available” in the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 118 inserted the seventh sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Consent for medical treatment of minor by substitute judge. —

Without a specific appointment, a substitute judge is not a sitting judge, and therefore should not be called upon by a hospital seeking judicial consent for medical treatment of a minor. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Charles E. Poston, Judge, Fourth Judicial Circuit, 01-112 (2/28/02).

§ 16.1-69.22.
Removal of judges and substitute judges.

Any judge or substitute judge of a district court may be removed from office in the manner and for any of the causes prescribed in Chapter 9 (§

17.1-900

et seq.) of Title 17.1; provided, that substitute judges may be removed from office under the provisions of §§

24.2-230

through

24.2-238

.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Law Review.

For proposal for the removal or retirement of unfit judges, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 554 (1968).

§ 16.1-69.22:1.
Temporary recall of retired district court judges; evaluation.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may call upon any judge of a district court who is retired under the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.) and who has been found qualified within the preceding three years by the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice to (i) hear a specific case or cases pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-69.35

with such designation to continue in effect for the duration of the case or cases or (ii) perform, for a period not to exceed 90 days at any one time, such judicial duties in any district court as the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall deem in the public interest for the expeditious disposition of the business of such courts.

It shall be the obligation of any retired judge who is recalled to temporary service under this section and who has not attained age 70 to accept the recall and perform the duties assigned. It shall be within the discretion of any judge who has attained age 70 to accept such recall.

Any judge recalled to duty under this section shall have all the powers, duties, and privileges attendant on the position he is recalled to serve.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Chief Justice may call upon and authorize any judge of a district court whose retirement becomes effective during the interim period between regularly scheduled sessions of the General Assembly to sit in recall either to (i) hear a specific case or cases pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-69.35

, which designation shall continue in effect for the duration of the case or cases, or (ii) perform, for a period of time not to exceed 90 days at any one time, such judicial duties in any district court as the Chief Justice shall deem in the public interest for the expeditious disposition of the business of the courts.

All retired district court judges who have requested to sit in recall shall be evaluated during the final year of the three-year period following qualification by the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice using an evaluation form prepared and distributed by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia. An annual report containing the results of such evaluations conducted that year shall be prepared and transmitted to the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by the first day of the next regular session of the General Assembly.

History.

1990, c. 832; 2014, c. 776; 2022, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 776, effective April 23, 2014, in subsection A inserted “(i) hear a specific case or cases pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-69.35

with such designation to continue in effect for the duration of the case or cases or (ii).”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, deleted “and authorize” following “upon”, inserted “and who has been found qualified within the preceding three years by the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice”, and substituted “90 days” for “ninety days”; substituted “70” for “seventy” twice in subsection B; and added subsections D and E.

§ 16.1-69.23.
In what cases judge disqualified.

If the judge or substitute judge of any district court:

Be a party to an action;

Be interested in the result of any action, otherwise than as resident or taxpayer of the city or county;

Be related to any party to the action as spouse, grandparent, parent, father-in-law, mother-in-law, child, grandchild, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother, sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, uncle, aunt, first cousin, guardian or ward;

Be a material witness for either party to the action;

Be counsel for any party to the action;he shall not take cognizance thereof.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

§ 16.1-69.24.
Contempt of court.

A judge of a district court shall have the same powers and jurisdiction as a judge of a circuit court to punish summarily for contempt, but in no case shall the fine exceed $250 and imprisonment exceed 10 days for the same contempt. From any such fine or sentence, there shall be an appeal of right within the period prescribed in this title and to the court or courts designated therein for appeals in other cases, and the proceedings on such appeal shall conform in all respects to the provisions of §§

18.2-456

through

18.2-459

.

Any person charged with a felony offense, misdemeanor offense, or released on a summons pursuant to §

19.2-73

or

19.2-74

who fails to appear before any court or judicial officer as required shall not be punished for contempt under this provision but may be punished for such contempt under subdivision A 6 of §

18.2-456

.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 2000, cc. 164, 185; 2019, c. 708.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 164 and 185 are identical, and substituted “$250” for “fifty dollars” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 708 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

§ 16.1-69.25.
Judge may issue warrants, summons, and subpoenas.

Except as otherwise provided by general law, a judge of a district court may, within the scope of his general jurisdiction, issue warrants, summons, and subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum or other process, in civil, traffic and criminal cases, to be returned before his court, and may also issue fugitive warrants and conduct proceedings thereon in accordance with the provisions of §§

19.2-99

through

19.2-104

.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1994, c. 500; 2014, cc. 305, 310.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 305 and 310, are identical, and deleted “within the area which his court serves” following “jurisdiction.”

§ 16.1-69.25:1.
Judge shall order bill of particulars; time for motion.

Upon request of either party, a judge of a district court may direct the filing of a written bill of particulars at any time before trial and within a period of time specified in the order so requiring. Motions for bills of particulars in criminal cases before general district courts shall be made before a plea is entered and at least seven days before the day fixed for trial.

History.

1980, c. 338; 1998, cc. 482, 495.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 482 and 495 are identical, and added “Upon request of either party” in the first sentence.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Bill of particulars approved. —

Due to the unusual nature of the allegations and the sweeping, comprehensive relief that was requested, a motion for a bill of particulars was approved. Wiebel v. Hunt, 68 Va. Cir. 191, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 66 (Greene County June 28, 2005).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Commonwealth’s Attorney may request a bill of particulars. —

A Commonwealth’s Attorney is authorized to request that a bill of particulars be ordered in a district court where a motion to suppress evidence has been filed but includes no factual basis for the motion.
See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 13-051, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (8/16/13).

Demurrer. —

A demurrer can be filed in both general district courts and circuit courts to challenge the legal sufficiency of a cause of action. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-078,
(2/4/15).

§ 16.1-69.26.
Judges as conservators of the peace.

The judge of each district court having criminal jurisdiction shall be a conservator of the peace within the limits of the territory in which he serves; and if such court is a city court, the judge thereof shall, except as otherwise provided by general law, also be a conservator of the peace for the area extending for one mile beyond the corporate limits of the city.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Cross references.

For provisions as to the powers and duties of conservators of the peace, see §§

19.2-18

through

19.2-23

.

§ 16.1-69.27.
Additional powers of judges.

A judge of a district court may take affidavits and administer oaths and affirmations in all matters and proceedings, may issue all appropriate orders or writs, including orders appointing guardians ad litem in all proper cases, in aid of the jurisdiction conferred upon him, and may certify transcripts of the records and proceedings of the court for use elsewhere. But he shall have no authority to take acknowledgments to deeds or other writings for purposes of recordation.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

§ 16.1-69.28.
Commitment of insane, etc., persons.

A judge of a district court shall have and may exercise, concurrently with special justices appointed for the purpose, the jurisdiction conferred by general law upon justices, and special justices in all matters in connection with the adjudication and commitment of incapacitated persons, including drug-addicted and inebriate persons, and the institution and conduct of proceedings thereof. Such proceedings may be had at any place within the jurisdiction of the court over which such judge presides.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1997, c. 801.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 801, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, substituted “incapacitated persons, including” for “legally incompetent” near the end of the first sentence.

§ 16.1-69.29.
Jurisdiction over certain waters.

Where any river, watercourse or bay lies between any counties or any cities, or any county and city in this Commonwealth, the district courts therein, on each side, respectively, shall have concurrent territorial jurisdiction over so much thereof as shall be opposite to such counties and cities. And such courts for counties or cities lying on the waters bounding the Commonwealth shall have concurrent territorial jurisdiction respectively over such waters opposite such counties and cities, as far as the jurisdiction of this Commonwealth extends. But this section shall not apply to the City of Richmond.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 2005, cc. 45, 114.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 45 and 114 are identical, and substituted “City of Richmond” for “Cities of Richmond and Norfolk” at the end of the section.